Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.060

Hearing—Defective petition—Establishment of boundaries.

At the time stated in the notice of the filing of the petition or the time mentioned in the resolution of intention, the county commissioners shall consider the organization of the district and hear those appearing and all protests and objections to it. The commissioners may adjourn the hearing from time to time, not exceeding two months in all.

No defect in the contents of the petition or in the title to or form of the notice or signatures, or lack of signatures thereto, shall vitiate any proceedings if the petition has a sufficient number of qualified signatures.

On the final hearing the county commissioners shall make such changes in the proposed boundaries as are advisable, and shall define and establish the boundaries.

[ 1957 c 153 s 6.]